Illinois, session 104th, HB4135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Illinois 5Correctional Data and Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 7adding Section 3-2-12.1 as follows: 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-12.1 new)9    Sec. 3-2-12.1. Recidivism data; Department of Corrections 10publication and website posting.11    (a) The General Assembly recognizes that recidivism 12tracking is essential to public safety and fiscal oversight.13    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish 14clear definitions, a deadline for public reporting, basic 15interagency data-sharing, and open methodology.16    (c) Beginning March 1, 2026 and every March 1 thereafter, 17the Department of Corrections shall submit to the General 18Assembly a recidivism report which the Department shall post 19on its website and make publicly available.20    (d) The report shall contain the prior fiscal year release 21cohort and updates of prior release cohorts, including 22statewide release rates by:  HB4135- 2 -LRB104 15322 RLC 28476 b1        (1) offense class;2        (2) age;3        (3) gender;4        (4) county of commitment;5        (5) facility;6        (6) sentence type;7        (7) release type; and8        (8) methods used to make the data determinations 9    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) to be published in an 10    appendix to that data.11    The release rates shall be published on a public 12dashboard.13    (e) Within 60 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 15of Corrections must file and post a recidivism IT remediation 16plan, consisting of timelines, milestones, and responsible 17staff.18    (f) Until the first new report is posted, the Department 19must file monthly status updates with the House 20Appropriations-Public Safety Committee and the Senate 21Appropriations-Public Safety and Infrastructure Committee.22    (g) The Department of Corrections shall enter into 23standing memoranda of understanding, which shall be updated at 24least annually, providing periodic feeds needed to compute 25recidivism, with privacy protections, between the Department 26and:  HB4135- 3 -LRB104 15322 RLC 28476 b1        (1) the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 2    concerning court dispositions;3        (2) the Illinois State Police concerning arrest and 4    identifier data submitted to the Illinois State Police 5    under the Criminal Identification Act; and6        (3) county sheriffs and jail administrators concerning 7    booking information and returns of persons previously 8    committed to county jails.9    (h) The Department of Corrections shall receive limited 10extracts from other State agencies concerning persons who have 11been committed to the Department, if already collected. The 12Department shall maintain all existing confidentiality and 13victim privacy rights required by law and administrative rule.14    (i) The Department of Corrections shall publish aggregate 15and de-identified data with small-cell suppression.16    (j) Unit-record identifiable data shall not be disclosed 17to the public. Research access to the data shall be only 18available by approved agreements with the Department of 19Corrections.20    (k) If the annual report is filed more than 60 days after 21the March 1 due date, the Director of Corrections or his or her 22designee must appear before designated committees of the 23General Assembly with a remediation plan. Subject to 24appropriation, the Auditor General may conduct a performance 25audit of data processes.  26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4135- 4 -LRB104 15322 RLC 28476 b1becoming law.